Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-32] Acquisitions; payment. (a)
If the landowner agrees to the sale of the interest in lands pursuant to
section 163D-31, the landowner and the corporation shall agree on whether the
landowner shall receive payment for the interest in a lump sum or through an
installment purchase agreement pursuant to section 163D-33.

(b) The corporation may make payments from
moneys appropriated by the legislature. [L 2008, c 234, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next